Utah statutes.
40-7-1.   Interstate compact to conserve oil and gas -- Authority for governor to join.

The governor of the state of Utah is authorized and directed, for and in the name of the state of Utah to join with the other states in the Interstate Oil Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas, which was executed in Dallas, Texas, on the 16th day of February, 1935, and has been extended to the 1st day of September, 1959, with the consent of Congress, and that said compact and all extensions are now on deposit with the department of state of the United States.



Enacted by Chapter 131, 1957 General Session

